Connecticut, session 2026, HB05268.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 46b-486 of the general statutes is repealed and the
2 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 The Department of Public Health may release information relating to
4 an acknowledgment of parentage to (1) a signatory of the
5 acknowledgment, (2) the child if such child is eighteen years of age or
6 older, (3) a guardian of the person whose parentage is acknowledged,
7 (4) an attorney representing a person to whom such information may be
8 released, (5) a court, (6) a federal agency, (7) an authorized
9 representative of the Department of Social Services, (8) an authorized
10 representative of the Department of Children and Families, (9) the child
11 support agency of this state, (10) any agency acting under a cooperative
12 or purchase of service agreement with the child support agency of this
13 state, and (11) the child support agency of another state.
HB5268 / File No. 12 1

HB5268 File No. 12
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 46b-486
KID Joint Favorable
HB5268 / File No. 12 2

HB5268 File No. 12
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes a procedural change relating to an acknowledgment
of parentage, resulting in no fiscal impact.
HB5268 / File No. 12 3

HB5268 File No. 12
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5268
AN ACT AUTHORIZING THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
TO RELEASE INFORMATION RELATING TO AN
ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF PARENTAGE TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
CHILDREN AND FAMILIES.